Washington statutes.
RCW 17.28.380

Consolidation of districts—Election.

When the concurrent resolution for consolidation has been adopted, each board of the districts proposed for consolidation shall forthwith call a special election in its district in which shall be presented to the electors of the districts the question whether the consolidation shall be effected.

The election shall be conducted and the returns canvassed and declared insofar as is practicable in accordance with the requirements of this chapter for the formation of a district.

The board of each district shall declare the returns of the election in its district, and shall certify the results to the county commissioners of the county in which all the districts, or the major portion of the land of all the districts, are situated.

[ 1957 c 153 s 38.]